Illinois, session 104th, SB2566.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The sum of $84,037,400, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Sports 7Facilities Fund to the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority 8for its corporate purposes. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.